Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2166.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-823, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-823. Legislative district committee; organization; boundary change; reorganization A. A political party entitled to representation on the ballot pursuant to section 16-801 or 16-804 may establish a district party committee for any legislative district as prescribed by law. B. A district party committee established pursuant to subsection A of this section shall consist of the precinct committeemen residing in the district and elected pursuant to section 16-821. C. Each district party committee established pursuant to subsection A of this section shall meet no earlier than the second Saturday after the general election provided for in section 16-211 and no later than the first Saturday in the following December and organize by electing from its membership a chairman, two vice chairmen, a secretary and a treasurer. The latter two offices may be filled by the same person. In addition, the district party committee shall elect state committeemen as prescribed by section 16-825.  The chairman of the district committee is ex officio a member of the county committee of the county in which a plurality of the district's registered voters resides and is a nonvoting member of that county committee unless the CHAIRMAN resides in that county.  For any district committee that has a county subcommittee, the county subcommittee may not take any action that binds the legislative district committee. D. Each district party committee established pursuant to subsection A of this section shall meet after the effective date of reapportionment legislation that realigns or changes legislative district boundaries and organize according to the new boundaries, electing from its membership a chairman, two vice chairmen, a secretary and a treasurer.  The latter two offices may be filled by the same person. In addition, the district party committee shall elect state committeemen as prescribed by section 16-825.  The chairman of the district committee is ex officio a member of the county committee of the county in which a plurality of the district's registered voters resides and is a nonvoting member of that county committee unless the CHAIRMAN resides in that county. The effective date for reapportionment legislation as provided in this subsection shall be as provided in article IV, part 1, section 1, Constitution of Arizona. E. In the event If the reapportionment legislation is challenged in court or by the United States justice department, the district organizations in effect before the passage adoption of the reapportionment legislation shall continue to function along with the new district organizations created in accordance with subsection D of this section until the final settlement or adjudication of any legal challenge to the reapportionment legislation. On the final settlement or adjudication of any legal challenge to the reapportionment legislation the district organizations in effect before the enactment adoption of the reapportionment legislation are considered dissolved. F. If the boundaries of any district are changed as a result of legal action, each district party committee in that district shall meet as soon as possible and organize according to the boundaries that result from the legal action. On organization pursuant to this subsection all prior district organizations are dissolved. G. For the purposes of the election prescribed in subsection D of this section the district committee shall consist of all precinct committeemen residing in the district who were serving in that position at least thirty days before the enactment of reapportionment legislation. H. The chairman of the legislative district committee shall give notice of the time and place of the meetings prescribed by this section by United States mail to each precinct committeeman at least ten days before the date of the meeting.  If the precinct committeeman has provided a valid e-mail email address and has authorized the chairman to give notice to the precinct committeeman by e-mail email instead of by United States mail, the chairman of the legislative district committee shall provide notice of the meeting by e-mail email at least ten days before the date of the meeting.END_STATUTE